Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 4. Industry Representatives

§ 12-5-401.
Interests in licenses or permits to sell.

No industry representative shall hold any interest, stock or ownership directly or indirectly, in any license to sell products of the industry at retail under privileges of a license or permit to sell any beverage or liquor in Wyoming or in any premises so licensed. This section shall not apply to any person holding a microbrewery permit pursuant to W.S.

12-4-415

or a winery permit pursuant to W.S.

12-4-414

. This section shall also not apply to a person holding a manufacturer’s license under W.S. 12-2-203(a) when the license is held under the complete ownership of a retail business and to the extent he may be permitted two (2) satellite manufacturer’s permits pursuant to W.S. 12-2-203(g)(i) or an off-premises permit pursuant to W.S. 12-2-203(g)(ii).

As used in subsection (a) of this section:

“Complete ownership” means that all officers, owners or members are identical for all licenses and permits held;

“Retail business” means the holder of a microbrewery or winery permit.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, §§ 20, 24; C.S. 1945, §§ 53-220, 53-224; W.S. 1957, §§ 12-22, 12-26; W.S. 1977, §§ 12-2-124, 12-2-128; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1999, ch. 61, § 1; 2012, ch. 19, § 1; 2019 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 158, § 1, effective February 28, 2019; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “W.S. 12-2-203(g)(i) or an off-premises permit pursuant to W.S. 12-2-203(g)(ii)” for “W.S. 12-2-203(g).”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 158, § 1, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), and added “when the license is held under the complete ownership of a retail business and” following “W.S. 12-2-203(a)”; and added (b).

Laws 2019, ch. 158, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), deleted "or winery" following "microbrewery" and substituted "12-4-415 or a winery permit pursuant to W.S.

12-4-414

" for "12-4-412"; and deleted "who also holds a license or permit enumerated under W.S.

12-4-412

(b)(iii) or (k)" at the end of (b)(ii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), substituted "two (2)" for "one (1)" and "permits" for "permit" following "satellite manufacturer's."

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Wyoming wholesale license will not be issued to liquor retailer.

Lamp Liquors, Inc. v. Adolph Coors Co., 410 F. Supp. 536, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15751 (D. Wyo. 1976).

§ 12-5-402.
Furnishing of money and products; payment in full for malt beverages; credit for alcoholic liquor; credit deficiencies.

Except as otherwise authorized in this section or W.S.

12-5-403

, industry representatives shall not furnish, give or lend money or other things of value, directly or indirectly, to any person engaged in selling products of the industry at retail under privileges of a license or permit to sell any beverage or liquor in Wyoming. The prohibition shall extend to the giving to any person for the use, benefit or relief of the person engaged in selling the industry’s products and to prohibit guaranty by the industry of a loan or other financial obligation of persons engaged at retail in selling these products. With prior approval of the applicable licensing authority, malt beverage industry representatives may furnish, give or lend money or other things of value to a licensee to support annual community events open to the public if the licensee:

Is a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state;

Is qualified as a tax exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code; and

Has been in continuous operation for a period of not less than two (2) years.

No sale or delivery of malt beverages shall be made by a wholesaler to any licensee except for payment in full made at the time of or prior to delivery, and a licensee shall not accept or receive delivery of malt beverages except when payment is made at or prior to delivery.

The division may grant credit to retailers when purchasing alcoholic liquor for a period not to exceed four (4) days from date of shipment. Payments by mail for credit shipments shall be postmarked within twenty-four (24) hours of the receipt of the shipment by the retailer. The division may seize and sell all stocks of liquor of the retailer to satisfy any credit balance. Any deficiency constitutes a lien on any proceeds received through transfer of the license or permit. If a retailer defaults in payment for a shipment under this section, no further shipments shall be made to him for a period of one (1) year except on a C.O.D. basis.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 21; C.S. 1945, § 53-221; Laws 1953, ch. 132, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-23; Laws 1973, ch. 26, § 1; 1975, ch. 14, § 1; 1977, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-125; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 51, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2009 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), added the exception and the last sentence; and added (a)(i) through (a)(iii).

Laws 2009, ch. 51 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” twice in (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of liquor regulation forbidding or restricting credit sales, 17 ALR3d 396.

§ 12-5-403.
Furnishing of equipment; advertising materials; records to be kept.

Industry representatives shall not furnish, give, rent, lend or sell at cost or below, either directly or indirectly, any equipment, fixtures or supplies to any person engaged in selling products of the industry under the privileges of a retail liquor license or limited retail liquor license. No person licensed to sell products of the industry shall receive or be the beneficiary of any of the prohibited benefits.

The following materials when furnished free of charge to the wholesaler or an alcoholic beverage supplies representative, are exempt from subsection (a) of this section and may be furnished, given or loaned to any retail liquor licensee or limited retail liquor licensee:

National advertising and promotional materials bearing advertising matter and having no value to the retailer except as advertisements;

Consumer advertising specialties bearing advertising matter;

Retailer’s advertising specialties bearing advertising matter; and

Standard brewery or manufacturer’s signs.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 99, § 2.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 22; C.S. 1945, § 53-222; W.S. 1957, § 12-24; Laws 1967, ch. 173, § 1; 1977, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-126; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1995, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of statutes, ordinances or regulations prohibiting or regulating advertising of intoxicating liquors, 20 ALR4th 600.

§ 12-5-404.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 99, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 22, related to standard brewery or manufacturer's signs.

§ 12-5-405.
Sale of alcoholic liquor.

Industry representatives shall not sell or attempt to sell any alcoholic liquor within Wyoming, except to the division. Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117,§ 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; W.S. 1957, § 12-39(k); W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51,§ 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission.”